Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 4. Garnishment
§ 1-15-424.
Failure to proceed against nonexempt garnished earnings.

If a judgment creditor
fails, within sixty (60) days from the filing of the answer of the
garnishee, to secure a garnishee judgment and execute on garnished
nonexempt earnings held by a garnishee pursuant to a writ of post
judgment garnishment, the writ of garnishment which commanded the
garnishee to hold the nonexempt portion of the defendant’s earnings
shall be released and discharged without further order of the court.
In that event the garnishee shall pay to the judgment debtor that
portion of his earnings which had been held pursuant to the writ of
garnishment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1988, ch. 42, § 1.

§ 1-15-425.
Garnishee bound.

A garnishee served with
a writ of prejudgment or post judgment garnishment shall hold for
the benefit of the plaintiff all property of the defendant in his
possession, and money and credits due from him to the defendant, from
the time he is served with the writ until the writ is discharged.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 131; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534, 538; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882, 2886, 3547; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001, 4005, 4458; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860, 4864, 5321; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130, 6134, 6593; Laws 1927, ch. 30, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1607, 89-3310 to 89-3314, 89-3318; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014, 3-5018, 14-1407; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-243, 1-577; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114, 1-15-118, 1-21-307; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1988, ch. 42, § 1.

Garnishee becomes liable to plaintiff from time of service

of the writ, to the amount of any property or indebtedness belonging to or due to the defendant, and is required to make answer to the writ showing such property or debt. Service of the writ upon the garnishee makes the garnishee liable for such property, and not the return, which the officer is required to make to the court of the action taken by him in the service of the writ. L.C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1951).

A garnishment is virtually a process of attachment,

and a garnishee is bound from the time of service. United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

It gives the creditor a paramount right,

although not necessarily title, to property as a security for his demand. United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

The issuing court acquires jurisdiction of the debt upon service of writ

of attachment on garnishee. Great Falls Transfer & Storage Co. v. Pan American Petroleum Corp., 353 F.2d 348, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 3762 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1965).

And garnishee thereupon becomes liable to garnishor to extent of debt

until discharged or any judgment recovered is satisfied. Great Falls Transfer & Storage Co. v. Pan American Petroleum Corp., 353 F.2d 348, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 3762 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1965).

Lien rendered complete. —

The filing of suit by lienor, coupled with the subsequent garnishment proceedings, resulting in deposit of the funds, rendered lienor's lien choate in that: (a) the lienor was established; (b) the property subject to the lien had been established and, in fact, seized and placed in the court's custody; and (c) the amount of the lien, excluding fees and interest, had been established by oral judgment. United States v. Hunt, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

Priority in time of service of writ of attachment determines superiority

of conflicting attachments or garnishments of the same indebtedness. Great Falls Transfer & Storage Co. v. Pan American Petroleum Corp., 353 F.2d 348, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 3762 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1965).

Cited

in

Union Pac. R.R. v. Trona Valley Fed. Credit Union, 2002 WY 165, 57 P.3d 1203,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).